New York, session 2025-2026, A4305.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 1219 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law is amended to read as follows: 3 (a) No person shall throw or deposit upon any highway any glass 4 bottle, glass, nails, tacks, wire, cans, grass clippings, snow or any 5 other substance likely to injure any person, animal, or vehicle upon 6 such highway. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08439-01-5